ja: キックポイント: ハイ; ロー; ミッド; 可変; その他
es: Punto de flexión: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Variable; Otro
zh-TW: 彎曲點: 高折點; 低折點; 中折點; 可變折點; 其他
el: Σημείο κάμψης (Kick point): Υψηλό; Χαμηλό; Μεσαίο; Μεταβλητό; Άλλο
pt-PT: Ponto de flexão: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Variável; Outro
en: Kick point: High; Low; Mid; Variable; Other
pl: Punkt ugięcia: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Zmienny; Inny
vi: Điểm uốn cong: Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Biến thiên; Khác
bg-BG: Точка на огъване: Висока; Ниска; Средна; Променлива; Друго
ru: Точка прогиба: Высокая; Низкая; Средняя; Переменная; Другое
cs: Bod výkopu: Vysoký; Nízký; Střední; Variabilní; Jiné
zh-CN: 杆身弯曲点: 高; 低; 中; 可变; 其他
sk-SK: Bod ohybu: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Premenlivý; Iné
th: จุดเตะ: สูง; ต่ำ; กลาง; ผันแปร; อื่นๆ
hu: Meghajlítási pont: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Változó; Egyéb
de: Kickpunkt: Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Variabel; Sonstige
fr: Point de flexion: Haut; Bas; Moyen; Variable; Autre
nb: Kickpunkt: Høy; Lav; Midt; Variabel; Annet
pt-BR: Ponto de flexão: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Variável; Outro
ro-RO: Punct de flexie: Sus; Jos; Mijloc; Variabil; Altele
sl-SI: Točka upogiba: Visoko; Nizko; Srednje; Spremenljivo; Drugo
it: Punto di flessione: Alto; Basso; Medio; Variabile; Altro
lt-LT: Lenkimo taškas: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kintamas; Kita
tr: Esneme noktası: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Değişken; Diğer
sv: Böjpunkt (kick point): Hög; Låg; Mellan; Variabel; Övrigt
da: Stavens bøjningspunkt: Høj; Lav; Middel; Variabel; Andet
ko: 킥 포인트: 하이; 로우; 미드; 가변형; 기타
hr-HR: Točka udarca: Visoko; Nisko; Srednje; Promjenjivo; Ostalo
fi: Taivutuspiste: Korkea; Matala; Keskitaso; Vaihteleva; Muu
nl: Kickpunt: Hoog; Laag; Midden; Variabel; Anders